Hawaii statutes.
[§211D-11] State liability prohibited.
The State is not liable to a participating financial institution for payment of
the principal, the interest, or any late charges on a capital access loan made
under this chapter. [L 2000, c 290, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next